Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-14,101
Noncompliance by tenant; landlord's rights.

(1) If there is a noncompliance with section 76-1493 materially affecting health and safety or a material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement, the landlord may deliver a written notice to the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than thirty days after receipt of the notice. Only in the event the breach is remediable by repairs or the payment of damages and the tenant adequately remedies the breach or takes reasonable steps to remedy it prior to the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement shall not terminate.

(2) If rent is unpaid when due and the tenant fails to pay rent within seven days after written notice by the landlord of nonpayment and of the landlord's intention to terminate the rental agreement if the rent is not paid within that period of time, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement.

(3) A landlord may recover damages, obtain injunctive relief, or recover possession of the mobile home space by an action in forcible detainer for any material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or section 76-1493 by bringing an action for possession in the manner described in sections 76-1440 to 76-1447.

(4) The remedy provided in subsection (3) of this section shall be in addition to any right of a landlord arising under subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 52;

Laws 2021, LB320, § 13.